North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-15.3 Wholesale Drug Pedigree
43-15.3-08.
Prohibited acts — Penalty.

Except as otherwise provided under section 43-15.3-09, it is a class B misdemeanor for a person to perform or cause the performance of or aid and abet any of the following acts in this state:

Failing to obtain a license under this chapter or operating without a valid license when a license is required by this chapter.

If the requirements of subsection 1 of section 43-15.3-05 are applicable and are not met, purchasing or otherwise receiving a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment from a pharmacy.

If a state license is required under subsection 2 of section 43-15.3-05, selling, distributing, or transferring a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment to a person that is not authorized under the law of the jurisdiction in which the person receives the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment to receive the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment.

Failing to deliver prescription drugs, medical gases, or medical equipment to specified premises, as required by subsection 3 of section 43-15.3-05.

Accepting payment or credit for the sale of prescription drugs, medical gases, or medical equipment in violation of subsection 5 of section 43-15.3-05.

Failing to maintain or provide pedigrees as required by this chapter.

Failing to obtain, pass, or authenticate a pedigree, as required by this chapter.

Providing the board or any of the board’s representatives or any federal official with false or fraudulent records or making false or fraudulent statements regarding any matter within the provisions of this chapter.

Obtaining or attempting to obtain a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or engaging in misrepresentation or fraud in the distribution of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment.

Except for the wholesale distribution by manufacturers of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment that has been delivered into commerce pursuant to an application approved under federal law by the federal food and drug administration, manufacturing, repacking, selling, transferring, delivering, holding, or offering for sale any prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment that is adulterated, misbranded, counterfeit, suspected of being counterfeit, or has otherwise been rendered unfit for distribution.

Except for the wholesale distribution by a manufacturer of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment that has been delivered into commerce under an application approved under federal law by the federal food and drug administration, adulterating, misbranding, or counterfeiting any prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment.

Receiving any prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment that is adulterated, misbranded, stolen, obtained by fraud or deceit, counterfeit, or suspected of being counterfeit, and the delivery or proffered delivery of such drug, gas, or equipment for pay or otherwise.

Altering, mutilating, destroying, obliterating, or removing the whole or any part of the labeling of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment or the commission of any other act with respect to a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment which results in the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment being misbranded.

The prohibited acts in subsection 1 do not include a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment manufacturer or agent of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment manufacturer obtaining or attempting to obtain a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment for the sole purpose of testing the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment for authenticity.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 367, § 2; 2013, ch. 322, § 6.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-15.3-09.
Penalties.

The board may impose the following sanctions if, after a hearing under chapter 28-32, the board finds that a person violated section 43-15.3-08:

Revoke, suspend, or limit the wholesale distributor’s license issued under this chapter if the person is a wholesale distributor; or

Assess a civil penalty against the person. A civil penalty assessed may not exceed ten thousand dollars per violation.

The board, upon a showing of a violation of this chapter, may revoke, suspend, or limit a license issued under this chapter after a proceeding under chapter 28-32. After a proceeding under chapter 28-32, the board may assess a civil penalty against a licensed wholesale distributor of not more than ten thousand dollars for each occurrence. If the licensed wholesale distributor fails to pay the civil penalty within the time specified by the board, the board may suspend the license without additional proceedings.

Upon application by the board, a court may grant an injunction, a restraining order, or other order to enjoin a person from offering to engage or engaging in the performance of any practices for which a permit or license is required by any applicable federal or state law including this chapter, upon a showing that the practices were or are likely to be performed or offered to be performed without a permit or license. An action brought under this subsection must be commenced either in the county where the conduct occurred or is likely to occur or in the county in the state where the defendant resides. An action brought under this subsection is in addition to any other penalty provided by law and may be brought concurrently with other actions to enforce this chapter.

A person that knowingly purchases or receives a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment through any source other than a person licensed under this chapter, including a wholesale distributor, manufacturer, pharmacy distributor, or pharmacy commits a class A misdemeanor. A subsequent unrelated violation of this subsection is a class C felony.

A person that knowingly fails to provide a duly authorized individual the right of entry as provided in subsection 5 of section 43-15.3-04 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the first conviction and a class C felony for each subsequent conviction.

A person that knowingly or intentionally engages in the wholesale distribution of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment without a license issued under this chapter commits a class C felony. A person is guilty of a class C felony if that person engages in the wholesale distribution of a prescription drug and with intent to defraud or deceive fails to obtain or deliver to another person a complete and accurate required pedigree concerning a prescription drug before obtaining the prescription drug from another person or transferring the prescription drug to another person or falsely swears or certifies that the person has authenticated any documents to the wholesale distribution of prescription drugs.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if that person engages in the wholesale distribution of a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment and knowingly or intentionally:

Destroys, alters, conceals, or fails to maintain a complete and accurate required pedigree concerning a prescription drug in the person’s possession;

Purchases or receives prescription drugs, medical gases, or medical equipment from a person not authorized to distribute prescription drugs, medical gases, or medical equipment in wholesale distribution;

Sells, barters, brokers, or transfers a prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment to a person not authorized to purchase the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment in the jurisdiction in which the person receives the prescription drug, medical gas, or medical equipment in a wholesale distribution;

Forges, counterfeits, or falsely creates a pedigree;

Falsely represents a factual matter contained in a pedigree; or

Fails to record material information required to be recorded in a pedigree.

A person is guilty of a class C felony if that person engages in the wholesale distribution of a prescription drug and possesses a required pedigree concerning a prescription drug, knowingly or intentionally fails to authenticate the matters contained in the pedigree as required, and distributes or attempts to further distribute the prescription drug.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 367, § 2; 2013, ch. 322, § 7.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-15.3-10.
Retail medical gas retailers — Reciprocity.

A person may not sell or deliver medical gases and related medical equipment directly to a consumer unless licensed by the board as a retail medical gas retailer.

As a term of licensure under this section, a licensee shall employ or contract with an in-state licensed respiratory therapist or other health care professional authorized by that professional’s practice act to prescribe or administer the medical gases and related medical equipment. The applicant shall furnish on the application the name and license number of the individual or licensee the applicant employees or with which the applicant contracts. Within thirty days of a change, a retailer shall provide the board with notice of any change in the licensee.

A retail medical gas retailer may sell or deliver to a patient’s home medical gases and related equipment in accordance with a practitioner’s prescription or drug order. The retail medical gas retailer shall keep the original drug order or an electronic copy of each drug order at the licensed location or must have available for inspection an electronic copy of the original drug order or electronic copy of the drug order. A prescription or drug order is not valid after one year, except a prescription or order for maintenance equipment may be perpetual. A retail medical gas retailer shall maintain a prescription or drug order for five years.

An out-of-state retail medical gas retailer or a principal or agent of the retailer may not conduct business in this state unless the retailer is licensed by the board as a retail medical gas retailer, paid the fee required by the board, and is registered with the secretary of state. An applicant shall submit an application for a license on a form furnished by the board and the application must be accompanied by a copy of the certificate of authority from the secretary of state. The issuance of a license under this section does not change or affect tax liability imposed by this state on an out-of-state medical gas retailer.

The board may adopt rules that permit an out-of-state retail medical gas retailer to obtain a license on the basis of reciprocity if the retailer possesses a valid license granted by another jurisdiction and the legal standards for licensure in the other jurisdiction are comparable to the standards under this chapter and if the other jurisdiction extends reciprocity to retail medical gas retailers licensed in this state. However, if the requirements for licensure under this chapter are more restrictive than the standards of the other jurisdiction, the out-of-state retail medical gas retailer shall comply with the additional requirements of this chapter to obtain a license under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 8.

43-15.3-11.
Retail durable medical equipment retailers — Reciprocity.

A person may not sell or deliver durable medical equipment directly to a consumer unless licensed by the board as a retail durable medical equipment retailer.

As a term of licensure under this section, a licensee shall employ or contract with an in- state licensed health care professional authorized by that professional’s practice act to prescribe or administer the durable medical equipment. For purposes of this section, a licensed health care professional may include a respiratory therapist, physical therapist, pharmacist, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, and occupational therapist.

The licensed health care professional must be on staff to oversee and provide custom orthotics and prosthetics. The board shall establish certification requirements for a qualified health care professional which may include certification through the American board for certification in orthotics and prosthetics or the board for certification in orthotics as a certified orthotist, certified prosthetist, certified prosthetist orthotist, certified orthotic fitter, certified mastectomy fitter, or certified pedorthist.

The licensed health care professional must be on staff to oversee and provide complex rehabilitation products and services for seating and mobility systems. The board shall establish certification requirements for a qualified health care professional which may include certification through the rehabilitation engineering and assistive technology society of North America as an assistive technology professional.

The applicant shall furnish on the application the name and license number of the individual the licensee employs or with which the applicant contracts. Within thirty days of a change, the licensee shall provide the board with notice of any change in the licensee.

A durable medical equipment retailer may sell or deliver to a patient’s home durable medical-related equipment in accordance with a practitioner’s prescription or drug order. The retail durable medical equipment retailer shall keep the original prescription or order or an electronic copy at the licensed location or must have available for inspection an electronic copy of the original order or electronic copy of the order. A prescription or order is not valid after one year, except a prescription or order for repair, maintenance, or replacement of equipment and items designated as thirteen month capped rental items by the center of Medicare and Medicaid services may be perpetual. A retail durable medical equipment retailer shall maintain a prescription or order for five years. A durable medical equipment retailer may only obtain medical equipment from a manufacturer or wholesaler that is duly licensed by the state.

An out-of-state retail durable medical equipment retailer or a principal or agent of the retailer may not conduct business in this state unless the retailer is licensed by the board as a retail durable medical equipment retailer, paid the fee required by the board, and is registered with the secretary of state. An applicant shall submit an application for a license on a form furnished by the board and the applicant must be accompanied by a copy of the certificate of authority from the secretary of state. The issuance of a license under this section does not change or affect tax liability imposed by this state on an out-of-state retail durable medical equipment retailer.

The board may adopt rules that permit an out-of-state retail durable medical equipment retailer to obtain a license on the basis of reciprocity if the retailer possesses a valid license granted by another jurisdiction and the legal standards for licensure in the other jurisdiction are comparable to the standards under this chapter and if the other jurisdiction extends reciprocity to retail durable medical equipment retailers licensed in this state. However, if the requirements for licensure under this chapter are more restrictive than the standards of the other jurisdiction, the out-of-state retail durable medical equipment retailer shall comply with the additional requirements of this chapter to obtain a license under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 9; 2015, ch. 296, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

43-15.3-12.
Fees.

The board shall charge and collect the following fees under this chapter:

Chain drug warehouse $200 Chain pharmacy warehouse $200 Durable medical equipment distributor, medical gas distributor, or both $200 Durable medical equipment retailer, medical gas retailer and distributor, or both $300 Hospital offsite warehouse $200 Jobber or broker Not to exceed $1,000 Manufacturer Not to exceed $1,000 Medical gas retailer, durable medical equipment retailer, or both $200 Medical gas durable medical equipment distributor and retailer $300 Outsourcing facility $200 Own label distributor Not to exceed $1,000 Pharmacy distributor $200 Private label distributor Not to exceed $1,000 Repackager Not to exceed $1,000 Reverse distributor $200 Third-party logistic provider Not to exceed $1,000 Veterinary-only distributor $200 Virtual manufacturer $400 Virtual wholesaler or distributor Not to exceed $1,000 Wholesaler or distributor Not to exceed $1,000

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 322, § 10; 2017, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 242, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

43-15.3-13.
Compounding provided by an outsourcing facility.

A facility may provide, without a patient specific prescription, a nonpatient specific compounded drug preparation for human use only, if the following conditions apply:

The entity is registered with the United States food and drug administration as an outsourcing facility pursuant to section 503(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 353(b)]; and

The entity is licensed under this chapter with an outsourcing facility classification, has designated a licensed pharmacist in the state of residence as the responsible person on the license, and the facility meets the standards for licensure set in this chapter.

Within forty-eight hours of a request from the board, the facility shall make available to the board any inspection reports, federal food and drug administration reports of objectionable conditions issued against the facility, and lists of distribution of products to the state.

The facility shall comply with all labeling and recordkeeping requirements pursuant to section 503(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 353(b)].

Notwithstanding contrary provisions of this chapter, an outsourcing facility may compound and sell in the state a compounded calcium gluconate product intended for the emergency treatment of hydrofluoric acid exposure without obtaining a license under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 296, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 353, § 1, effective March 20, 2019.

43-15.3-14.
Third-party logistics providers.

Each third-party logistics provider shall comply with the standards for licensure; requirements to distribute prescription drugs, medical gases, or medical equipment; restrictions on transactions; and pedigree requirements set forward in this chapter.

The board shall issue a separate license to each qualified third-party logistics provider applying for licensure.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 296, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.